District of Columbia statutes.
42-2705.02

Advisory Committees.

The Agency, from time to time, may establish advisory committees or groups to advise the Agency with respect to matters the Agency shall designate and may appoint persons to serve on such advisory committees or groups as the Agency may deem necessary consistent with the provisions of this chapter. The function of such committees or groups shall be solely advisory in nature, and no such committee or group shall have authority to act for, or on behalf, of the Agency.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 502, 25 DCR 5008
Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-28, § 2(u), 28 DCR 2848
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-247, § 2(t), 46 DCR 1100
1981 Ed., § 45-2152.
1973 Ed., § 45-1928.